Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 2 Georgia State Patrol

35-2-30.
Creation and designation.

There is created and established a division of the Department of Public Safety to be known as the Uniform Division, the members of which shall be known and designated as the “Georgia State Patrol.”

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 1.

35-2-31.
Composition.

The Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety shall consist of:

The officers, noncommissioned officers, and troopers of the headquarters staff;

The officers, noncommissioned officers, and troopers of one battalion.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 2; Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 4; Ga. L. 1952, p. 129, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 298, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 573, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 103, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 296, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1960, p. 132, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1115, § 1.

35-2-32.
Jurisdiction; primary duty; patrolling of safety rest areas and welcome centers.

The Uniform Division of the department shall have jurisdiction throughout this state with such duties and powers as are prescribed by law.

It shall be the primary duty of the Uniform Division to patrol the public roads and highways of this state, including interstate and state maintained highways, and to safeguard the lives and property of the public; and such duty shall also include accident investigation and traffic enforcement. The Uniform Division shall prevent, detect, and investigate violations of the criminal laws of this state, any other state, or the United States which are committed upon these public roads and highways or upon property appertaining thereto and shall apprehend and arrest those persons who violate such criminal laws.

Without limiting the generality of any other provisions of this article, it is specifically provided that the Uniform Division shall have jurisdiction to patrol safety rest areas and welcome centers located on or adjacent to the state highway system for the purposes of: (1) enforcing the laws of this state relating to the use, ownership, control, licensing, and registration of motor vehicles; (2) enforcing the criminal laws of this state; and (3) enforcing the laws of this state and the regulations of the Department of Transportation with respect to the use of such safety rest areas and welcome centers. The limitations of paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 35-2-33 shall not apply with respect to enforcement in safety rest areas and welcome centers.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 14; Ga. L. 1950, p. 77, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 577, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1450, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1329, § 1.

Cross references.

Powers and duties of Uniform Division upon and within the limits of Jekyll Island, §

12-3-236.1

.

35-2-33.
Additional duties.

It shall be the duty of the Uniform Division:

To enforce the laws of this state relating to the use, ownership, control, licensing, and registration of motor vehicles and Code Sections 32-9-4 and 40-6-54, relating to designation of restricted travel lanes;

On property owned by this state or any agency thereof:

To enforce the criminal laws of this state;

To apprehend and arrest any person who violates the criminal laws of this state; and

To serve and execute warrants;

To apprehend and arrest any person who is a fugitive from justice;

To suppress riots, labor strikes, or picketing, as provided by law, at the direction of the Governor on request made by the chief of police of any municipality or the sheriff of any county; and

To make initial inquiries into any situation which occurs off the public roads and highways and which occurs under circumstances where it has reasonable grounds to believe a criminal law has been, is being, or is about to be violated. The Uniform Division shall further have the duty to make arrests in connection with such initial inquiries.

Any initial inquiry or arrest which is made pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall be initiated only if a local law enforcement officer is not readily available and the member of the Uniform Division reasonably believes that his failure to act could result in the commission of a criminal act or the escape of a person who has committed a criminal act. In any action taken by the Uniform Division under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the Uniform Division shall relinquish jurisdiction to the local law enforcement agency as soon as possible under the circumstances.

The Uniform Division shall cooperate with all law enforcement agencies of this state or any municipality, county, or other political subdivision thereof in enforcing the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States relating to the operation of motor vehicles. The commissioner may, and in the case of a request by the Governor shall, authorize and direct the Uniform Division to cooperate with and render assistance to any law enforcement agency of this state or any municipality, county, or other political subdivision thereof in any criminal case, in the prevention or detection of violations of any law, or in the apprehension or arrest of persons who violate the criminal laws of this state, any other state, or the United States, upon a request by the governing authority or chief law enforcement officer of any municipality, the sheriff of any county, a judge of the superior court of any county, or the Governor.

The commissioner may, and in the case of a request by the Governor shall, authorize and direct the Uniform Division to:

Provide security protection services, or transportation or escort services, or both to coaches, players, and referees and other officials in connection with collegiate athletic events involving an institution of the University System of Georgia which offers four-year postsecondary degrees when such security protection services, or transportation or escort services, or both are necessary or appropriate to deter actual or potential threats to the safety of such individuals;

Provide services which are necessary or appropriate to promote the safety of the collegiate athletic teams of such institutions of the University System of Georgia which offer four-year postsecondary degrees or the general public or both or to facilitate travel by such collegiate athletic teams or the general public or both;

Allow personnel of the Uniform Division, while on duty and in uniform, to accompany collegiate athletic teams of such institutions of the University System of Georgia which offer four-year postsecondary degrees traveling to athletic events inside or outside the state and to make use of department vehicles for this purpose, provided that the department shall be reimbursed by such affected institution of the University System of Georgia for any expenses incurred by such personnel of the Uniform Division while carrying out such duties; and

Allow personnel of the Uniform Division, while on duty and in uniform, to provide security at special events at any location, whether or not the event takes place on state property.

In no case where the Uniform Division is exercising any power or performing any duty authorized by this Code section shall it usurp any of the duties or authority of any sheriff of any county, any chief of police of any municipality, or any chief of police of any county police force.

The duties and powers of the Uniform Division, as provided for in this Code section, shall be in addition to any other duties or powers provided by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, §§ 14, 15; Ga. L. 1950, p. 77, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 495, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 577, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 447, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 254, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1450, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1982, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 35; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1507, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 13A-1/HB 501.

Cross references.

Powers and duties of Uniform Division upon and within the limits of Jeckyll Island, §

12-3-236.1

.

Registration and licensing of motor vehicles generally, T. 40, C. 2.

35-2-34.
Composition of headquarters staff.

The headquarters staff shall be composed of the commissioner, deputy commissioner, and such other commissioned and noncommissioned officers, troopers, and clerical personnel as the commissioner deems necessary for use at headquarters.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 2; Ga. L. 1946, p. 39, § 1; Ga. L. 1952, p. 129, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 298, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 573, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 103, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 296, § 3; Ga. L. 1960, p. 132, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1115, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 228, § 1.

Cross references.

Composition of the battalion, §

35-2-36

.

35-2-35.
Performance of clerical duties by headquarters staff; transfer of members of headquarters staff by commissioner.

The clerical duties at headquarters shall be performed by the headquarters staff. The commissioner, in his discretion, may transfer any member of the headquarters staff to any other division or district for any other duty.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 2; Ga. L. 1946, p. 39, § 1; Ga. L. 1952, p. 129, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 298, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 573, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 103, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 296, § 3; Ga. L. 1960, p. 132, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1115, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 228, § 1.

35-2-36.
Composition of battalion; rank of battalion personnel; employment of recruits or cadets by commissioner; promulgation of rules and regulations as to enlistment and training of recruits or cadets.

The battalion of the Uniform Division shall consist of such personnel as the commissioner, with the approval of the board, may deem necessary within the limits set by available appropriations.

The personnel of the battalion shall be ranked according to a semimilitary structure with such ranks as the board shall deem appropriate, including, but not restricted to, the following:

Major;

Captain;

First lieutenant;

Sergeant first class;

Sergeant;

Corporal;

Trooper first class;

Trooper;

Trooper cadets; and

Process servers.

Within the limits set by available appropriations, the commissioner, with the approval of the board, is authorized to employ such recruits or cadets as may be deemed necessary, who may become members of the Uniform Division but who shall not be members of the Uniform Division so long as they remain recruits or cadets; provided, however, that such recruits or cadets are designated as “peace officers” as such term is defined in paragraph (11) of Code Section 16-1-3 and shall have the authority of a peace officer.

The commissioner shall prescribe rules and regulations governing the enlistment and training of recruits or cadets subject to the approval of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 2; Ga. L. 1939, p. 135, § 2; Ga. L. 1946, p. 39, § 2; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1159, § 2; Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 4; Ga. L. 1951, p. 635, §§ 1, 1A; Ga. L. 1952, p. 129, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 298, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 573, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 103, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 296, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1960, p. 132, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 125, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 84, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 147, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 117, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 306, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 309, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 354, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 449, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1007, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1122, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1115, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 228, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1986, p. 452, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 312, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3131, § 2.

35-2-36.1.
Auxiliary Service of the Uniform Division; appointment of members; salary; authority and powers; equipment; eligibility.

There is created within the Uniform Division, a special service known as the Auxiliary Service. The members of the Auxiliary Service of the Uniform Division shall be appointed by the commissioner on a part-time basis and shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner. The members shall have such rank as assigned by the commissioner. The members of the Auxiliary Service shall be paid on an hourly basis and, with the exception of workers’ compensation medical coverage and any benefits mandated by federal law, shall not be entitled to any employee benefits based on their employment in the Auxiliary Service.

Members of the Auxiliary Service shall have the same authority and powers as other members of the Uniform Division.

The commissioner is authorized to furnish the members of the Auxiliary Service with such equipment, uniforms, and badges as the commissioner deems necessary for the duties of such members.

No person shall be eligible for appointment in the Auxiliary Service unless that person has, prior to such appointment, successfully completed trooper school, served in the Uniform Division, and voluntarily left the Uniform Division in good standing through retirement, resignation, or otherwise. Persons appointed to the Auxiliary Service must complete the annual training required under Code Section 35-8-21 for certified law enforcement officers, provided that such persons may serve up to six months without having such training. The Department of Public Safety is authorized to provide or to pay for such training in the same fashion that it provides or pays for such training for members of the Uniform Division.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-36.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 1507, § 2.

35-2-37.
Employment of communications officers to support battalion generally.

To support the battalion, the commissioner, with the approval of the board, is authorized to employ such communications officers as may be necessary, within the limits set by available appropriations. Such personnel shall not be considered members of the Uniform Division. Communications officers may be divided into such ranks or categories as the commissioner, with the approval of the board, deems appropriate.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 2; Ga. L. 1939, p. 135, § 2; Ga. L. 1946, p. 39, § 2; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1159, § 2; Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 4; Ga. L. 1951, p. 635, §§ 1, 1A; Ga. L. 1952, p. 129, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 298, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 573, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 103, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 296, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1960, p. 132, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 125, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 84, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 147, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 117, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 306, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 309, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 354, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 449, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1007, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1122, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1115, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 228, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 12-4.

35-2-38.
Division of state into districts or divisions by commissioner.

The commissioner, with the approval of the board, is authorized to divide the state into districts or divisions as may be necessary for the purpose of effectually patrolling the public roads and highways of the state and of the counties thereof and for combating, detecting, and preventing crime.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 11; Ga. L. 1946, p. 39, § 3.

35-2-39.
Provision of barracks and quarters for officers and troopers of Uniform Division.

The commissioner is authorized, with the approval of the board, to provide comfortable barracks and quarters for the officers and troopers of the Uniform Division.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 11; Ga. L. 1946, p. 39, § 3.

35-2-40.
Purchase, lease, or construction of barracks and equipment for districts or divisions; acceptance of property, equipment, or services.

In the event any district or division headquarters is established by the commissioner, he shall be authorized, with the approval of the board, to purchase, lease, or construct proper quarters or barracks for the men and equipment at such district or division, and to this end may contract with municipalities, persons, or corporations in the name of the state. Subject to the provisions of Code Section 50-16-38 and Code Section 35-2-41.1, the board is authorized to accept in the name and on behalf of the state any property, equipment, or service that may be donated for use at headquarters or any division or district thereof which may be of value to any division of the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 12; Ga. L. 1985, p. 486, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, in the second sentence “35-2-41.1” was substituted for “35-2-40.1”.

35-2-41.
Municipality and county purchase or conveyance of property for use as division or district headquarters; effect if property has reversionary clause; approval of contracts.

Subject to the provisions of Code Section 35-2-41.1, any municipality or county of this state is authorized to purchase and convey property by deed, gift, rent, or lease for the use of the department for division or district headquarters. If the deed from the municipality or county to the property to be used for such headquarters contains a reversionary clause to the effect that the property shall revert to the municipality or county in the event it ceases to be used for the headquarters, the commissioner shall not be authorized to enter into any contract or agreement relative to the construction of quarters, barracks, or other facilities for such headquarters which shall, in any manner whatsoever, obligate the department to pay for more than one-half the costs of construction of the quarters, barracks, or other facilities. Any such contract or agreement must be approved by the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 12; Ga. L. 1964, p. 144, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 486, § 2.

35-2-41.1.
Donation or conveyance of property, equipment, or services to the department; procedure.

Any offer to donate or convey by deed, gift, rent, lease, or other means any property, equipment, or services to the department shall be made in writing through command channels to the commissioner. If the commissioner approves the offer, he or she shall submit a written proposal of the offer to the board for its approval. A copy of the formal proposal shall be forwarded by the commissioner to the Office of Planning and Budget, the Senate Budget and Evaluation Office, and the House Budget and Research Office, any of which may comment on the proposal.

Title to real property shall be in the State of Georgia for the use of the Department of Public Safety. No member of the department shall be authorized to accept any donation or conveyance of property, equipment, or services unless the provisions of this Code section have been complied with and until the board has approved the donation or conveyance.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-41.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 486, § 3; Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 1-16/HB 529; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 35/SB 340.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, which amended this Code section, was passed by the General Assembly as HB 529 at the 2007 regular session but vetoed by the Governor on May 30, 2007. The General Assembly overrode that veto on January 28, 2008, and the Act became effective on that date.

35-2-42.
Personnel administration.

All members of the Uniform Division, all communications officers, and all recruits or cadets shall be governed by rules and regulations as now or hereafter established under Chapter 20 of Title 45.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 2; Ga. L. 1939, p. 135, § 2; Ga. L. 1946, p. 39, § 2; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1159, § 2; Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 4; Ga. L. 1951, p. 635, §§ 1, 1A; Ga. L. 1952, p. 129, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 298, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 573, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 103, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 296, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1960, p. 132, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 125, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 84, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 147, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 117, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 306, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 309, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 354, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 449, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1007, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1122, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1115, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 228, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3131, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 12-5; Ga. L. 2006, p. 1050, § 1/SB 520; Ga. L. 2021, p. 463, § 2/SB 198.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 4, 2021, rewrote this Code section, which read: “(a) All members of the Uniform Division, all communications officers, and all recruits or cadets shall be governed by rules and regulations as now or hereafter established under Chapter 20 of Title 45.

“(b) The board shall be authorized to provide for a subsistence and per diem allowance for commissioned officers, noncommissioned officers, and troopers of the Uniform Division.

“(c) The board shall be authorized to pay to sworn members of the Department of Public Safety additional compensation to be paid upon retirement in the form of the badge and the duty weapon issued by the department to such member.

“(d) The board shall be authorized to grant incentive pay to those members of the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety and those members of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation who have obtained degrees or certificates from an accredited member of the Federation of Regional Accrediting Commissions of Higher Education or who have obtained a degree or certificate of completion from some other educational institution with respect to a course of instruction related to law enforcement, so long as both the course of instruction and the institution are specifically approved by the board. Any such incentive pay shall be paid according to the following schedule:

“(1) Completion of at least one year of degree-creditable college study consisting of the equivalent of 30 semester hours or 45 quarter hours of education: $200.00 per year;

“(2) Obtaining of associate or two-year degree or certificate of completion of 60 semester hours or 90 quarter hours of education: $400.00 per year;

“(3) Obtaining of a bachelor’s or four-year degree: $800.00 per year.

“(e) This Code section is not intended to repeal existing law concerning the following:

“(1) The authority of the board to pay certain medical expenses incurred by any member of the Georgia State Patrol or the Georgia Bureau of Investigation;

“(2) The authority of the commissioner to provide uniforms and supplies to members of the Uniform Division;

“(3) The requirement that board and quarters be furnished to every member of the Uniform Division on active duty; or

“(4) The authorization for officers and troopers to receive a legal award offered for the apprehension of any criminal.”

35-2-43.
[Reserved] Eligibility for appointment to or enlistment in Uniform Division; appointment or reappointment of discharged members of National Guard, armed forces of the United States, and law enforcement agencies.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 3; Ga. L. 1945, p. 117, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 5; Ga. L. 1976, p. 524, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 895, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1375, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 271, § 2; repealed by Ga. L. 1998, p. 852, § 1, effective April 10, 1998.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 852, § 1 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective April 10, 1998.

35-2-44.
Enlistment, examination, preliminary training, subsequent instruction, and rules and regulations for discipline and conduct of recruits and troopers of Uniform Division.

It shall be the duty of the commissioner, subject to the laws of this state, to arrange for the enlistment and examination of applicants for service as troopers or officers of the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety, to provide the necessary preliminary training and subsequent instruction of troopers and recruits as peace officers of this state, and to make all necessary rules and regulations for the discipline, conduct, and control of all officers, troopers, and other employees of the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 8.

35-2-45.
Promotions of personnel in Uniform Division.

Any trooper first class of the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety shall be eligible for promotion to the rank of corporal, provided he has served a period of 12 months in the Georgia State Patrol including the period of probation.

Any noncommissioned or commissioned officer shall be eligible for promotion to a higher rank, provided he has served at least one year in the preceding rank.

Promotions to ranks of corporal through lieutenant shall be made in accordance with the Georgia State Patrol Promotion System.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 4; Ga. L. 1939, p. 135, § 4; Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 6; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1115, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3131, § 4.

35-2-46.
Dismissal of officers, troopers, and communications officers.

All officers, troopers, and communications officers who are in the classified service as defined by Code Section 45-20-2 may be dismissed from their employment with the department only in accordance with Chapter 20 of Title 45 and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 5; Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 7; Ga. L. 1976, p. 465, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3131, § 5; Ga. L. 1997, p. 880, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 12-6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-47/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

35-2-47.
Suspension pending dismissal.

All officers, troopers, and communications officers who are in the classified service as defined by Code Section 45-20-2 may be suspended pending their dismissal from employment with the department as provided in Chapter 20 of Title 45 or the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 5; Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 7; Ga. L. 1976, p. 465, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3131, § 6; Ga. L. 1997, p. 880, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 12-6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 1/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-48/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

35-2-48.
[Reserved] State Patrol Disciplinary Board; composition; appointment and terms of members; conduct of hearings by board; recommendation to commissioner; finality of commissioner’s decision.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1992, p. 3131, § 7, effective July 1, 1992.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 5; Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 7; Ga. L. 1976, p. 465, § 1; Ga. L. 1981 Ex. Sess., p. 8; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1986, p. 193, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 35; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1375, § 2 and Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 35.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 12-6, reserved this Code section.

35-2-49.
Provision of uniforms and equipment to sworn members of the Department of Public Safety and radio operators; retention of weapons and badges upon retirement.

The commissioner shall, within the limit of the appropriation, provide the sworn members of the Department of Public Safety with proper uniforms, suitable to the season, and also with emergency and first-aid outfits, weapons, motor vehicles with radio equipment, and all other necessary supplies and equipment for the purpose of carrying out this article, the same to remain the property of the state; provided, however, that after a sworn member has accumulated 15 years of service with the Department of Public Safety, including prior service with the Department of Driver Services (formerly known as the Department of Motor Vehicle Safety), Public Service Commission, Department of Transportation, or Georgia Building Authority, upon leaving the department under honorable conditions, or upon leaving the department as a result of a disability arising in the line of duty regardless of the number of years of service, such member shall be entitled, as part of his or her compensation, to retain his or her weapon and badge pursuant to regulations promulgated by the commissioner. The commissioner shall also, within the limit of the appropriation, provide proper uniforms and equipment to radio operators. After a radio operator has accumulated 15 years of service with the department, including prior service with the Department of Driver Services (formerly known as the Department of Motor Vehicle Safety), Public Service Commission, Department of Transportation, or Georgia Building Authority, upon leaving the department under honorable conditions, such radio operator shall be entitled, as part of his or her compensation, to retain his or her badge pursuant to regulations promulgated by the commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 9; Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 8; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1175, § 7; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1072, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 271, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 12-6; Ga. L. 2006, p. 1050, § 2/SB 520; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 35/HB 942.

35-2-49.1.
Retention of badge and weapon by disabled law enforcement officer.

As used in this Code section, the term “disability” means a disability that prevents an individual from working as a law enforcement officer.

When a member of the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety leaves the Uniform Division as a result of a disability arising in the line of duty, such member of the Uniform Division shall be entitled as part of such officer’s compensation to retain his or her weapon and badge in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-49.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 1058, § 3; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 35/HB 95.

35-2-50.
Purchasing of uniforms, supplies, and equipment.

The uniforms, supplies, and equipment authorized by Code Section 35-2-49 shall be purchased by the Department of Administrative Services, with the consent and approval of the Department of Public Safety, by bid let to the lowest and best bidder and in accordance with specifications named in the advertisement of bid.

The advertisement of the letting of contracts for the purchase of uniforms, supplies, or equipment shall be published in at least two issues of some public journal of the state published daily and having a state-wide circulation for not less than 15 days before the time bids for the contracts are opened. The Department of Administrative Services shall have the right to reject any and all bids.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 9; Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 8; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1072, § 1.

35-2-51.
Storeroom for excess clothing, equipment, and other articles; disposition of old and worn equipment.

The commissioner shall provide a storeroom or rooms where all excess supplies of clothing, equipment, and other articles shall be stored and shall insure the same against loss by fire.

All old and worn equipment must be delivered to the custodian or custodians of such storeroom or rooms, who need not be members of the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety nor subject to age limitations, to be properly receipted before new equipment shall be issued.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 9; Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 8.

35-2-52.
Clothing allowance for members of Uniform Division assigned permanently to personal security or special duty assignments.

The commissioner, at his discretion and subject to available funds, shall be authorized to pay to members of the Uniform Division a clothing allowance when the members are permanently assigned to personal security or special duty assignments which necessitate those members wearing clothing other than the uniform of the Uniform Division. The commissioner, subject to the approval of the Board of Public Safety, shall establish the amount of clothing allowance to be paid each year.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 9; Ga. L. 1949, p. 70, § 8; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1175, § 7; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1072, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 452, § 2.

35-2-53.
Members of Uniform Division to receive no costs or emoluments; exception for rewards; payment and distribution of fines and costs.

No member of the Uniform Division of the Department of Public Safety shall receive any costs, emoluments, or other compensation other than his salary and any additional compensation provided by or through federal funding to which he may be entitled, except a legal reward as otherwise stated in this article. All fines and costs shall be paid into the treasury of the tribunal having jurisdiction of the offense and distributed according to law.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, §§ 6, 15; Ga. L. 1973, p. 449, § 3.

35-2-54.
Purchase of group insurance.

The commissioner, with the approval of the board, is authorized to purchase group life, group accident, and group hospitalization insurance contracts, policies, or certificates issued to the members of the Uniform Division, provided that such contracts of insurance shall be approved by the board as to the amount of insurance, amount of premiums, and company issuing or writing them; provided, further, that the premiums for such contracts, policies, or certificates of insurance shall be paid by the members of the Uniform Division desiring to participate therein; and this purchase shall be in no way considered as incurring a liability on the part of the state to pay for such insurance.

The contracts, policies, or certificates of insurance, as provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section, may be made payable to the beneficiary designated by the member of the Uniform Division to whom the contracts, policies, or certificates are issued.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 277, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 35.

Cross references.

Indemnification of law enforcement officers killed or permanently disabled in the line of duty, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. VI.

Insuring and indemnification of public officers and employees, T. 45, C. 9.

State Employees’ Health Insurance Plan, T. 45, C. 18, A. 1.

35-2-55.
Compensatory time off for members of Uniform Division working on state holiday.

The commissioner is authorized and directed to arrange the work schedules of members of the Uniform Division in such a manner that each member shall be given compensatory time off for each day which he is required to work and which is also a legal state holiday. Such compensatory time off shall be given within 90 days of the holiday involved, except where the day of compensatory time off coincides with an emergency situation, in which case the granting of compensatory time off shall be postponed until such time as the emergency no longer exists.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 849.

35-2-56.
[Reserved] Use of motor vehicles or other equipment by members of Uniform Division.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 13; Ga. L. 1952, p. 3, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1310, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 560, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 385, § 4/HB 806, effective April 26, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 385, § 4/HB 806 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective April 26, 2016.

35-2-57.
Use of retired unmarked pursuit cars for training.

When an unmarked pursuit vehicle used by the Georgia State Patrol for the purpose of enforcing the traffic laws of this state is first removed from the field and will no longer be used on a regular basis for pursuit purposes, the commissioner of public safety is authorized, in his or her discretion, to make such pursuit vehicle available to the Georgia Public Safety Training Center for the purpose of training public safety officers pursuant to Chapter 5 of this title. Such vehicles may also be sold or traded pursuant to Code Section 35-2-58. Upon notification by the commissioner, the administrator of the Georgia Public Safety Training Center shall be authorized to take immediate possession of any such pursuit vehicle.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-57

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 317, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1, § 1/HB 253.

Cross references.

Georgia Public Safety Training Center, T. 35, C. 5.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 1059, § 3, effective April 7, 1986, repealed the Code section formerly codified as Code Section 35-2-57. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1937, p. 322, art. 2, § 1 and Ga. L. 1960, p. 247, § 1. For current provisions regarding falsely holding oneself out to be a peace officer or other public officer or employee, see Code Section 16-10-23.

35-2-58.
Approval by board to sell or trade surplus motor vehicles towards purchase of new motor vehicles.

Any other provision of law notwithstanding, the commissioner, subject to approval by the board, shall have the power to sell or trade surplus motor vehicles no longer needed by the department and use the proceeds from the sale or trade toward the purchase of new motor vehicles by the department.

Subject to approval by the board, available funds, and Article 3 of Chapter 5 of Title 50, the commissioner is authorized, in his or her discretion, to purchase new motor vehicles for use by the department.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this Code section. The disposition of motor vehicles by the department shall not be subject to Article 4 of Chapter 5 of Title 50 or subject to the procedures or approval of any other state agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-2-58

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1, § 2/HB 253.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Vehicle Sales Program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Public Safety, Chapter 570-34.